South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S1045.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Chapter 28, Title 12 of the S.C. Code, related to motor fuels subject to user fees and the imposition of those fees, is suspended for thirty days beginning on the effective date of this act. SECTION 2.  The suspension shall be automatically extended for an additional thirty days if, at the end of the initial suspension period imposed pursuant to SECTION 1, the average price of gasoline in South Carolina has not fallen by fifteen percent from the base price as established pursuant to this act. SECTION 3.  The Revenue and Fiscal Affairs Office shall determine the average price for a gallon of gasoline in this State on the effective date of this act. The average price per gallon, as determined by the Revenue and Fiscal Affairs Office pursuant to this SECTION, shall constitute the base price upon for the purposes of the automatic extension provided for in SECTION 2. The Revenue and Fiscal Affairs Office shall publish the base price for gasoline in a conspicuous place on its website. SECTION 4.  This joint resolution takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----